Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF788.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 9, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Marshall; MERIT Training Center 2,250,000 For a grant to the city of Marshall to design, construct, furnish, and equip deleted text begin improvementsdeleted text end new text begin a 50-yard and 300-yard firearms range and firearms support buildingsnew text end at the Minnesota Emergency Response and Industrial Training Center outlined in Phase 3 of the Master Development Plandeleted text begin , including: a 50-yard and 300-yard firearms range; firearms support buildings; and a live-burn buildout structuredeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end